Utah statutes.
67-5a-7.   Responsibilities of the director.

Under the general supervision of the council and within the policies established by the council, the director has the responsibility to:

(1)  assign, supervise, and direct the staff of the council;

(2)  implement the standards, policies, rules, and guidelines of the council;

(3)  prepare and administer the budget of the council and comply with the Utah Budgetary Procedures Act;

(4)  conduct studies of prosecution procedures and systems in the state, including reference to the district attorney prosecution system, and prepare reports and recommendations;

(5)  maintain liaison with governmental and other public and private groups having an interest in prosecution;

(6)  organize and administer a program of training and continuing legal education for prosecutors in the state, including establishing training standards for prosecutors;

(7)  screen all requests addressed to any specialized investigation and prosecution unit created in the Office of the Attorney General for the investigation and prosecution of any child abuse offenses; and

(8)  perform other duties as assigned by the council.



Amended by Chapter 354, 1997 General Session

